Massachusetts, session 194th, H2982.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by adding the following section:-  
Section 106. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, assistant 
coordinators of the electric monitoring department of the office of probation shall be eligible for 
classification as members of pension group 2 by the Massachusetts state board of retirement 
pursuant to section 3.